Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 1. Issuance, Expiration, and Renewal of Licenses.
Sec. 28.15.081.
Examination of applicants.

The department shall examine every applicant for a driver’s license. The examination must include a test of the applicant’s (1) eyesight, (2) ability to read and understand official traffic control devices, (3) knowledge of safe driving practices, (4) knowledge of the effects of alcohol and drugs on drivers and the dangers of driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs, (5) knowledge of the laws on driving while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, inhalant, or controlled substance, (6) knowledge of the laws on financial responsibility and mandatory motor vehicle liability insurance, and (7) knowledge of the traffic laws and regulations of the state. The examination may include a demonstration of ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the driving of a motor vehicle of the type and general class of vehicles for which the applicant seeks a license. However, an applicant who has not been previously issued a driver’s license by this or another jurisdiction shall demonstrate ability and shall present medical information that the department reasonably requires to determine fitness to safely drive a motor vehicle of the type and general class of vehicles for which the applicant seeks a license.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations under the procedures established by AS 44.62 necessary to implement this section and the department may obtain the services of, and consult with, medical authorities whose specialties relate to driving abilities for the purpose of making the medical determinations necessary under this section or AS

28.15.091

or

28.15.101

. Regulations adopted under this section must be approved by a concurrent resolution adopted by majority vote of each house of the legislature before becoming effective. The requirements of the eyesight test under this section may also be satisfied by presenting the current certification of a licensed physician or optometrist that the applicant’s vision meets or exceeds the standards established by the department. The commissioner shall request and receive assistance from the commissioner of health and social services in implementing this section.

A requirement for a medical examination under this chapter is satisfied if the applicant is the holder of a current and valid first- or second-class medical certificate issued under federal aviation regulations and has satisfied any applicable requirement of the Department of Education and Early Development relating to tests for tuberculosis if applicable.

The department may enter into agreements with other state agencies, municipalities, or qualified persons for the purpose of conducting the examinations required under this chapter.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 77 SLA 1983; am §§ 6, 17 ch 70 SLA 1984; am § 24 ch 108 SLA 1989; am § 9 ch 60 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (c) of this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For standards for licensing of drivers, see 2 AAC 90, art. 6.

Collateral references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d, Automobiles and Highway Traffic, § 123.

60 C.J.S., Motor Vehicles, § 276.

Sec. 28.15.085.
Alcohol and drug awareness and safety examination of applicants.

Notwithstanding another provision of this chapter and in addition to other requirements, a person applying for a new license after expiration of the person’s license on reaching 21 years of age under AS

28.15.099

must pass a test developed and administered by the department regarding alcohol and drug awareness and safety and the laws relating to alcohol, drugs, and driving before the license may be issued or renewed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 118 SLA 2008)

Sec. 28.15.090.
Access to license. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.091.
Department may require re-examination.

If the department has good cause to believe that a licensed driver is incompetent or otherwise not qualified to be licensed, it may upon written notice of at least 10 days to the licensee require the licensee to submit to an examination.
Upon conclusion of the examination, the department shall take action as may be appropriate and may cancel the license of the person, or may issue a restricted license under AS

28.15.121

, or restrict the type or class of vehicles that the person may drive.
If the licensee refuses or neglects to submit to examination, the department may suspend the driver’s license until the licensee complies with the requirements of re-examination.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For standards for licensing of drivers, see 2 AAC 90, art. 6.

Collateral references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d, Automobiles and Highway Traffic, § 123.

Sec. 28.15.099.
Expiration and renewal of license issued to person under 21 years of age.

Notwithstanding another provision of this chapter, a driver’s license issued to a person under 21 years of age expires 90 days after the person reaches 21 years of age.

History.

(§ 2 ch 118 SLA 2008)

Sec. 28.15.100.
Duplicates. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.101.
Expiration and renewal of driver’s license.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a driver’s license expires on the licensee’s birthday in the eighth year following issuance of the license. A license may be renewed within one year of its expiration upon proper application, payment of the required fee, and except when a license is renewed under (c) of this section, successful completion of a test of the licensee’s eyesight.

The department may defer the expiration of the driver’s license of a person who is outside the state under terms and conditions that the department shall prescribe by regulation.

A driver’s license may be renewed by mail or on the department’s Internet website if the licensee complies with (a) of this section, except that a license may not be renewed by mail or on the department’s Internet website if

the most recent renewal of the applicant’s license was by mail or on the department’s Internet website; or

the applicant is 69 years of age or older on the expiration date of the driver’s license being renewed.

Under regulations adopted by the department, the department may issue to a person a driver’s license with a duration of less than eight years if the person is authorized to stay in the United States for less than eight years or the period of authorized stay is indefinite. The department shall issue the license for the period of the authorized stay. If the period of authorized stay is indefinite, the department shall issue the license with a validity of up to eight years.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am §§ 1, 2 ch 32 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 6 FSSLA 1996; am § 1 ch 1 SLA 2014; am § 8 ch 45 SLA 2014; am §§ 11, 12 ch 8 SLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For standards for licensing of drivers, see 2 AAC 90, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, effective June 23, 2014, added (d).

The second 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (c), inserted “or on the department's Internet website” following “by mail” three times.

The 2017 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “in the eighth year” for “in the fifth year”; in (d), in the first sentence, twice substituted “eight years” for “five years”, in the third sentence substituted “up to eight years” for “one year”, at the end, deleted the last sentence, which read, “The department shall provide that a person receiving a license with a duration of less than five years under this subsection may renew the license without a renewal fee during a period of up to five years after first issuance of the license.”

Collateral references. —

60 C.J.S., Motor Vehicles, § 279.

Sec. 28.15.110.
Restrictions. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.111.
Licenses issued to drivers; anatomical gift and living will document.

Upon successful completion of the application and all required examinations, and upon payment of the required fee, the department shall issue to every qualified applicant a driver’s license indicating the type or general class of vehicles that the licensee may drive. The license must (1) display a distinguishing number assigned to the license; (2) display the licensee’s full name, address, date of birth, brief physical description, and photograph; (3) display either a facsimile of the signature of the licensee or a space upon which the licensee must write the licensee’s usual signature with pen and ink; (4) display physical security features designed to prevent tampering, counterfeiting, or duplication of the document for fraudulent purposes; (5) display, for a qualified applicant who is under 21 years of age, the words “UNDER 21”; and (6) to the extent the department is able, be designed to allow the electronic reading and electronic display of the information described under (2) of this subsection and the electronic reading and display and a physical display on the license that the person is restricted from purchasing alcoholic beverages under AS

04.16.160

. A license may not display the licensee’s social security number and is not valid until signed by the licensee. If facilities are not available for the taking of the photograph required under this section, the department shall endorse on the license, the words “valid without photograph.”

The department shall provide a method, at the time that an operator’s license is issued, by which the owner of a license may make an anatomical gift under AS 13.52. The method must provide a means by which the owner may cancel the anatomical gift. The department shall inform each applicant in writing that, if the applicant executes a gift under AS 13.52 and if the gift is made with the license, the department will transmit the information on the license to a donor registry created under AS

13.50.110

. The department shall also direct the applicant to notify a procurement organization or the department under AS

13.50.140

if the license is destroyed or mutilated or the gift is revoked under AS

13.52.183

. The department shall carry out the requirements of AS

13.50.100

—

13.50.190

.

At the request of an applicant, the department shall provide a veteran designation and United States flag replica on a license identifying the driver as a retired veteran, a veteran of the armed forces of the United States discharged under honorable conditions, or a Hmong veteran or Lao veteran who served in military operations in support of the United States in the Kingdom of Laos between February 28, 1961, and May 15, 1975. The department may not charge a fee solely for the designation. To receive a veteran designation, the driver shall make available proof of veteran status that shows that the person is retired, was discharged under honorable conditions, or is a Hmong veteran or Lao veteran. The department shall consult with the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs to determine the proof necessary to show that a person is a Hmong veteran or Lao veteran. With the approval of the applicant, the department shall make available to the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs the name and address of a driver receiving a veteran designation under this subsection. The department may charge a fee of $5 for replacement of a valid driver’s license with a new license with a veteran designation. A replacement license with a veteran designation issued for $5 under this subsection shall retain the expiration date of the license it replaces.

The department shall provide a method, at the time that a driver’s license is issued, by which the owner of a license may voluntarily designate on the license that the owner has a disability, including a cognitive, mental, neurological, or physical disability, or a combination of those disabilities. The department shall create a discreet symbol to place on the driver’s license of a person requesting the designation. The method must provide a means by which the owner may cancel the designation. The department may not charge a fee solely for the designation. To receive the designation, the person shall provide proof of the disability from a person licensed as a physician or physician assistant under AS 08.64, as a naturopath under AS 08.45, as an advanced practice nurse under AS 08.68, or as a licensed psychologist under AS 08.86. The department may charge a fee of $5 for replacement of a valid driver’s license with a new driver’s license with a disability designation and may charge a fee of $5 for replacement of a driver’s license with a disability designation with a new driver’s license without a disability designation.

The department may not engage in bulk sharing of facial images captured as a result of an application for a driver’s license with a database, other than a database established by the state, regardless of whether the applicant applied for a driver’s license that is federally compliant or a driver’s license that is not federally compliant. The prohibition in this subsection does not apply to a commercial driver’s license.

A commercial driver’s license must be federally compliant.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 50 SLA 1993; am § 21 ch 80 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 40 SLA 2001; am § 7 ch 68 SLA 2004; am § 7 ch 83 SLA 2004; am § 27 ch 24 SLA 2007; am § 34 ch 100 SLA 2008; am § 2 ch 68 SLA 2012; am §§ 13, 14 ch 8 SLA 2017; am § 6 ch 70 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2004, in subsection (b), “AS 13.52” was substituted for “AS 13.50 or includes an anatomical gift in a living will under AS 18.12” and “AS

13.52.170

” was substituted for “AS 13.50.050” in order to reconcile chs. 68 and 83, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For the applicability of the 2001 amendment of (a) of this section, see § 4, ch. 40, SLA 2001, in the 2001 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective March 1, 2013, added (c).

The 2017 amendment, effective August 17, 2017, added (d). Effective January 1, 2019, in (a), in (a)(2) deleted “color” preceding “photograph”, in (a)(4), substituted “physical security features designed to prevent tampering, counterfeiting, or duplication of the document for fraudulent purposes” for “a holographic symbol intended to prevent illegal alteration or duplication”; added (e) and (f).

The 2018 amendment, effective October 27, 2018, in (c), at the end of the first sentence, added “, or a Hmong veteran or a Lao veteran who served in military operations in support of the United States in the Kingdom of Laos between February 28, 1961 and May 15, 1975” and made related changes, added “, or is a Hmong veteran or Lao veteran” at the end of the second sentence, and made related changes, added the third sentence.

Sec. 28.15.120.
Expiration. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.121.
Restricted driver’s license.

The department, upon issuing a driver’s license, may for good cause impose restrictions suitable to the licensee’s driving ability with respect to special mechanical control devices required on a motor vehicle that the licensee drives. The department may impose other restrictions applicable to the licensee that it determines to be appropriate to assure the safe operation of a motor vehicle by the licensee.

The department may issue a special restricted license or may set out restrictions on the usual license form.

The department may, upon receiving satisfactory evidence of a violation of the restrictions on a license restricted or issued under this section, suspend the restricted license for a period not to exceed 30 days.

A person may not drive a motor vehicle in violation of the restrictions imposed on a restricted license.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For school bus driver permit, see 2 AAC 90, art. 2.

For classified driver's licenses, see 2 AAC 90, art. 4.

Sec. 28.15.130.
School bus drivers. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.131.
License to be carried and exhibited on demand.

A licensee shall have the licensee’s driver’s license in immediate possession at all times when driving a motor vehicle, and shall present the license for inspection upon the demand of a peace officer or other authorized representative of the Department of Public Safety identified as such to the licensee by the officer or representative. However, a person charged with violating this section may not be convicted if the person produces in court or in the office of the arresting or citing officer, a driver’s license previously issued to the person that was valid at the time of the person’s arrest or citation.

Violation of this section is an infraction.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am E.O. No. 99 § 46 (1997); am § 20 ch 20 SLA 2011)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective July 1, 2011, added (b).

Sec. 28.15.140.
Change of name. [Repealed, § 25 ch 144 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 28.15.141.
Duplicate driver’s license.

If a valid driver’s license issued under this chapter is lost or destroyed, the person to whom the license was issued may, upon payment of the required fee, obtain a duplicate license. A person who recovers an original license for which a duplicate has been issued shall immediately surrender the duplicate to the department.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Sec. 28.15.150.
Records. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.15.151.
Records to be kept by the department.

The department shall maintain a file of

every driver’s license application, license or permit, and duplicate driver’s license issued by it;

every license that has been suspended, revoked, canceled, limited, restricted, or denied, and the reasons for those actions;

all accident reports required to be forwarded to the department under this title; and

every disqualification of an individual from operating a commercial motor vehicle.

The department shall also maintain and update within 10 days after receipt by the department a file of all accident reports, abstracts of court records of convictions of vehicle, driver, and traffic offenses, and other information that the department considers necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

The department shall, upon request, subject to the applicable provisions of AS 12.62 and (f) of this section and without charging a fee, furnish (1) a municipal, state, or federal administrative or judicial agency with a certified abstract of the driving record of a driver within 10 days after receipt of the request by the department; and (2) a parent, foster parent, or guardian of a driver who is under 18 years of age and not an emancipated minor an abstract of the driving record of that driver; the department may refuse to release the driver’s address to the parent, foster parent, or guardian if the department determines that the release of the driver’s address poses a threat to the health or safety of the driver. The abstract must include a listing of accidents in which the driver has been determined by the department or a court of competent jurisdiction to have been liable, convictions of vehicle, driver, and traffic offenses, any actions taken upon the driver’s license, and information relating to financial responsibility.

The department shall, upon request and payment of a fee determined by the commissioner, furnish a driver or a person designated by the driver with an abstract or the original copy of the computer printed record of the driver’s record as provided in (c) of this section.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 144 SLA 1980.]

Except as provided otherwise in this section and in AS

15.07.195

, information and records under this section are declared confidential and private.

History.

(§ 19 ch 178 SLA 1978; am §§ 1, 2 ch 144 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 36 SLA 1999; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 23 SLA 2007; am § 6 ch 13 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For standards for licensing of drivers, see 2 AAC 90, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective May 28, 2016, in (f), inserted “and in AS

15.07.195

” preceding “information and records”.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Most, but not all, information pertaining to motor vehicle accidents contained in Department of Transportation and Public Facilities files or the computer data base is public information and should be released upon request.
However, certain information regarding particular accidents, including individual names and specific driver’s license information, must remain confidential by operation of statute. March 30, 1988, Op. Att’y Gen.

Although this section does not explicitly authorize any disclosure of traffic accident reports, these statutorily-required reports have historically been released upon request to those who were either involved in the accident or whose property was involved in the accident, or to their authorized agent, such as their attorney or insurance company. Other than these limited disclosures, however, these accident reports should not be released unless the requesting party has obtained a court order compelling production of the report. Nov. 25, 1994, Op. Att’y Gen.

A “second” photograph taken when a person obtains or renews a driver’s is a part of the license application and is thus a “confidential and private” record under this section.
As such, it may not be released to the public or to the press except in those circumstances in which it is apparent that the person would authorize the release if the person could be asked, such as when a person is kidnapped or missing, when publication of the photograph may facilitate the subject’s safe recovery. The photograph may also be used for photo line-ups by law enforcement agencies within the state. Nov. 25, 1994, Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

Inspection of motor vehicle records, right as to, 84 ALR2d 1261.

Sec. 28.15.160.
Court reports. [Repealed, § 19 ch 178 SLA 1978.]